Missouri, session 2026, HB2263.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 393, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 393.1685, to read as follows:
393.1685. 1. No public utility, as such term is defined in section 295.020, shall
require additional deposits or transfer fees to transfer services to the spouse of the
account holder when the account is in good standing and the account holder:
(1) Dies;
(2) Is deported; or
(3) Is incarcerated for more than thirty days.
2. (1) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 1 of this section, a new
deposit may be required if:
(a) The spouse has an unpaid bill within the last five years that, at the time of the
transfer request, remains unpaid and is not the subject of a dispute with any public
utility for the same type of service;
(b) The spouse has, in the last five years and without authorization, interfered
with or diverted the service of a public utility for the same type of service; or
(c) The spouse fails to provide proof of identity, such as government-issued photo
identification and Social Security number.
(2) If a new deposit is required under the provisions of this subsection, the public
utility shall permit the spouse to pay the deposit in installments unless the public utility
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2263 2
shows the spouse has previously interfered with, diverted, or used the service of the
utility without authorization.
3. A public utility may require proper documentation, such as a marriage
certificate or proof of residency, before transferring service to the spouse of the account
holder under subsection 1 of this section.
✔